Utah statutes.
41-12a-402.   Insurance certificate as proof of owner's or operator's security -- Resident.

Proof of owner's or operator's security may be furnished by filing with the department the written certificate of any insurer licensed in Utah certifying that there is in effect an insurance policy or combination of policies conforming to Section 31A-22-302 for the benefit of the person required to furnish proof of owner's or operator's security.  This certificate shall be furnished to the department in the form of an SR-22 issued by any insurer licensed in Utah.  The certificate shall give each policy number and the effective date of each policy.  The effective date of the policy may not be later than the effective date of the certificate.  The certificate shall designate by explicit description or by appropriate reference all motor vehicles covered, unless the policy is issued to a person who is not the owner of a motor vehicle.  Certificates filed under this section continue in force until cancelled under Section 41-12a-404, or until the requirement for a certificate is waived under Section 41-12a-411.



Enacted by Chapter 242, 1985 General Session

